Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-202
Bonds or insurance; officers and employees; premiums; payment.

The premiums written pursuant to section 11-201, shall be paid by the State of Nebraska out of such funds as may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature, upon the order of the Risk Manager. No officer, department, board, commission, or other agency of the state shall pay, or cause to be paid, the cost of or the premium of any officer or employee of the state out of public funds unless an order for such payment has been obtained from the Risk Manager.

Laws 1945, c. 13, § 2, p. 113;

Laws 1955, c. 17, § 2, p. 89;

Laws 1967, c. 36, § 4, p. 162;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 12.